Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1714.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 44, chapter 9, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 27, to read: ARTICLE 27. PRICE REGULATION START_STATUTE44-1383. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Commodity" includes any of the following: (a) Goods. (b) services. (c) Materials. (d) Merchandise. (e) Supplies. (f) Equipment. (g) Resources. (h) Any other commerce-related item that includes any of the following: (i) Food. (ii) Water. (iii) Ice. (iv) Electricity. (v) Building materials. (vi) Petroleum products. (vii) Medical supplies. (viii) Rent. 2. "State of emergency" has the same meaning prescribed in section 26-301.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE44-1383.01. Commodity pricing; state of emergency; enforcement; attorney general; violation; classification A. During a state of emergency, it is unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale any commodity that is necessary to preserve, protect or sustain the life, health or safety of an individual or the individual's property at a price that is excessively higher than the price at which the commodity was sold or offered for sale thirty days before the state of emergency was declared.  For the purposes of this subsection, prices are excessively higher when prices are at least ten percent higher than the highest price the person charged for the commodity during the thirty-day period immediately preceding the day on which the state of emergency was declared. B. A person who knowingly and wilfully violates subsection A of this section and receives a total value of at least $500 from the sale of commodities within a twenty-four-hour period during a state of emergency is guilty of a class 5 felony. C. A person who knowingly and wilfully charges excessively high prices during a state of emergency and receives a total value of not more than $500 from the sale of commodities within a twenty-four-hour period during a state of emergency is guilty of a class 6 felony. D. any violation of this article constitutes an unlawful practice under section 44-1522.  The attorney general may investigate and take appropriate action as prescribed by chapter 10, article 7 of this title. END_STATUTE